Washington statutes.
RCW 15.70.050

No liability as to United States.

The United States and the secretary of agriculture thereof, shall be held free from liability by virtue of the transfer of the assets to the director of agriculture of the state of Washington pursuant to this chapter.

[ 1961 c 11 s 15.70.050. Prior: 1951 c 169 s 5.]